test/src/morphology/N-baarbwl_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - bārbõl: # Noun 235 'eng /est kukerpuu/fin' - full paradigm
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Nom: bārbõl
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Gen: bārbõl
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Par: bārbõlt
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Dat: bārbõlõn
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Ins: bārbõlõks
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Ill: bārbõlõ
     bārbõl+N+Sg+Ela: bārbõlõst
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Nom: bārbõld
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Gen: bārbõld
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Par: bārbiļi
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Dat: bārbõldõn
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Ins: [bārbõld, õks]
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Ill: bārbiļiž
     bārbõl+N+Pl+Ela: bārbiļist
